Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 449.08, is amended to read: 449.08 TAX LEVY FOR FREE MUSIC IN THIRD CLASS CITIES. The council of any city of the third class may levy a tax for the purpose of providing free musical entertainment for the general public. The proceeds of this tax shall be used only for the purpose of providing free musical entertainment for the public. The annual expenditure for this purpose is limited to deleted text begin $3,000deleted text end new text begin $10,000new text end .